Massachusetts, session 194th, S27.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including the
provisions of Chapter 43 of the Acts of 2007, the city of Boston Police Department shall waive
the maximum age requirement for original appointment of police officers for Antonio Pires. If
Antonio Pires meets all other requirements set forth by the Boston Police Department, he shall be
eligible to have his name certified for original appointment to the position of police officer.
SECTION 2. The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion
thereof, should be held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent
jurisdiction, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions,
which remain in full force and effect.
of 2

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2